Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5345.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14-1-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 14-1 entitled "Proceedings in
Family Court" is hereby amended to read as follows:
14-1-6. Retention of jurisdiction.
(a) When the court shall have obtained jurisdiction over any child prior to the child having
attained the age of eighteen (18) years by the filing of a petition alleging that the child is wayward
or delinquent pursuant to § 14-1-5, the child shall, except as specifically provided in this chapter,
continue under the jurisdiction of the court until he or she becomes nineteen (19) years of age,
unless discharged prior to turning nineteen (19).
(b) When the court shall have obtained jurisdiction over any child prior to the child’s
eighteenth (18th) birthday by the filing of a miscellaneous petition or a petition alleging that the
child is wayward, delinquent, dependent, neglected, or abused pursuant to §§ 14-1-5 and 40-11-7
or 42-72-14 or any child in the care and custody of the state, the child shall, except as specifically
provided in this chapter, continue under the jurisdiction of the court until he or she becomes
eighteen (18) years of age; provided, that at least six (6) months prior to a child turning eighteen
(18) years of age, the court shall require the department of children, youth and families to provide
a description of the transition services including the child’s housing, health insurance, education
and/or employment plan; available mentors and continuing support services, including workforce
supports and employment services afforded the child in placement; or a detailed explanation as to

the reason those services were not offered. As part of the transition planning, the child shall be
informed by the department of the opportunity to voluntarily agree to extended care and placement
by the department and legal supervision by the court until age twenty-one (21) twenty-six (26). The
details of a child’s transition plan shall be developed in consultation with the child, wherever
possible, and approved by the court prior to the dismissal of an abuse, neglect, dependency, or
miscellaneous petition before the child’s twenty-first twenty-sixth birthday.
(c) A child, who is in foster care on their eighteenth birthday due to the filing of a
miscellaneous petition or a petition alleging that the child is wayward, delinquent, dependent,
neglected, or abused pursuant to § 14-1-5, § 40-11-7, or § 42-72-14, may voluntarily elect to
continue responsibility for care and placement from DCYF and to remain under the legal
supervision of the court as a young adult until age twenty-one (21) twenty-six (26), provided:
(1) The young adult was in the legal custody of the department at age eighteen (18); and
(2) The young adult is participating in at least one of the following:
(i) Completing the requirements to receive a high school diploma or GED;
(ii) Completing a secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent credential;
enrolled in an institution that provides postsecondary or vocational education;
(iii) Participating in a job-training program or an activity designed to promote or remove
barriers to employment;
(iv) Is employed for at least eighty (80) hours per month; or
(v) Is incapable of doing any of the foregoing due to a medical condition that is regularly
updated and documented in the case plan.
(d) A former foster child who was adopted or placed in guardianship with an adoption
assistance agreement or a guardianship assistance agreement that was executed on or after his or
her sixteenth birthday and prior to his or her eighteenth birthday, or a former foster child who was
reunified prior to their eighteenth birthday and reunification is not successful, may voluntarily agree
to extended care and placement by the department and legal supervision by the court until age
twenty-one (21) twenty-six (26) if the young adult satisfies the requirements in subsection (c)(2).
Provided, however, the department retains the right to review the request and first attempt to
address the issues through the adoption assistance agreement by providing post adoptive or post
guardianship support services to the young adult and his or her adoptive or guardianship family.
(e) Upon the request of the young adult, who voluntarily agreed to the extension of care
and placement by the department and legal supervision by the court, pursuant to subsections (c)
and (d) of this section, the court’s legal supervision and the department’s responsibility for care
and placement may be terminated. Provided, however, the young adult may request reinstatement
LC001119 - Page 2 of 7

of responsibility and resumption of the court’s legal supervision at any time prior to his or her
twenty-first twenty sixth birthday if the young adult meets the requirements set forth in subsection
(c)(2). If the department wishes to terminate the court’s legal supervision and its responsibility for
care and placement, it may file a motion for good cause. The court may exercise its discretion to
terminate legal supervision over the young adult at any time.
(f) With the consent of the person previously under the court’s supervision, the court may
reopen, extend, or retain its jurisdiction beyond that person’s twenty-first birthday until his or her
twenty-second birthday or until September 30, 2021, whichever date occurs first, under the
following circumstances:
(1) The person aged out of DCYF care or left foster care during the COVID-19 public
health emergency, defined as beginning on January 27, 2020, and is entitled to extended benefits
pursuant to the terms of the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021, Pub. L. No. 116-260; and
(2) The court has or had obtained jurisdiction over the person prior to his or her eighteenth
birthday by the filing of a miscellaneous petition or a petition alleging that the child is dependent,
abused, or neglected pursuant to § 14-1-5, § 40-11-7, or § 42-72-14 or after the person’s eighteenth
birthday pursuant to a voluntary extension of care petition; and
(3) Court supervision is necessary for the department of children, youth and families to
access IV-E funding to support such benefits, in whole or in part; and
(4) Court supervision is required to continue transition planning and to ensure the safety,
permanency, and well-being of older youth who remain in or who age out of foster care and re-
enter foster care.
(g) The court may retain jurisdiction of any child who is seriously emotionally disturbed
or developmentally delayed pursuant to § 42-72-5(b)(24)(v) until that child turns age twenty-one
(21) when the court shall have obtained jurisdiction over any child prior to the child’s eighteenth
birthday by the filing of a miscellaneous petition or a petition alleging that the child is dependent,
neglected, and/or abused pursuant to §§ 14-1-5, and 40-11-7, or 42-72-14.
(h) The department of children, youth and families shall work collaboratively with the
department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and other agencies,
in accordance with § 14-1-59, to provide the family court with a transition plan for those individuals
who come under the court’s jurisdiction pursuant to a petition alleging that the child is dependent,
neglected, and/or abused and who are seriously emotionally disturbed or developmentally delayed
pursuant to § 42-72-5(b)(24)(v). This plan shall be a joint plan presented to the court by the
department of children, youth and families and the department of behavioral healthcare,
developmental disabilities and hospitals. The plan shall include the behavioral healthcare,
LC001119 - Page 3 of 7

developmental disabilities and hospitals’ community or residential service level, health insurance
option, education plan, available mentors, continuing support services, workforce supports and
employment services, and the plan shall be provided to the court at least twelve (12) months prior
to discharge. At least three (3) months prior to discharge, the plan shall identify the specific
placement for the child, if a residential placement is needed. The court shall monitor the transition
plan. In the instance where the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and
hospitals has not made timely referrals to appropriate placements and services, the department of
children, youth and families may initiate referrals.
(i) The parent and/or guardian and/or guardian ad litem of a child who is seriously
emotionally disturbed or developmentally delayed pursuant to § 42-72-5(b)(24)(v), and who is
before the court pursuant to §§ 14-1-5(1)(iii) through 14-1-5(1)(v), § 40-11-7, or § 42-72-14, shall
be entitled to a transition hearing, as needed, when the child reaches the age of twenty (20) if no
appropriate transition plan has been submitted to the court by the department of children, youth and
families and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The
family court shall require that the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities
and hospitals shall immediately identify a liaison to work with the department of children, youth
and families until the child reaches the age of twenty-one (21) and an immediate transition plan be
submitted if the following facts are found:
(1) No suitable transition plan has been presented to the court addressing the levels of
service appropriate to meet the needs of the child as identified by the department of behavioral
healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; or
(2) No suitable housing options, health insurance, educational plan, available mentors,
continuing support services, workforce supports, and employment services have been identified for
the child.
(j) In any case where the court shall not have acquired jurisdiction over any person prior to
the person’s eighteenth (18th) birthday by the filing of a petition alleging that the person had
committed an offense, but a petition alleging that the person had committed an offense that would
be punishable as a felony if committed by an adult has been filed before that person attains the age
of nineteen (19) years of age, that person shall, except as specifically provided in this chapter, be
subject to the jurisdiction of the court until he or she becomes nineteen (19) years of age, unless
discharged prior to turning nineteen (19).
(k) In any case where the court shall not have acquired jurisdiction over any person prior
to the person attaining the age of nineteen (19) years by the filing of a petition alleging that the
person had committed an offense prior to the person attaining the age of eighteen (18) years that
LC001119 - Page 4 of 7

would be punishable as a felony if committed by an adult, that person shall be referred to the court
that had jurisdiction over the offense if it had been committed by an adult. The court shall have
jurisdiction to try that person for the offense committed prior to the person attaining the age of
eighteen (18) years and, upon conviction, may impose a sentence not exceeding the maximum
penalty provided for the conviction of that offense.
(l) In any case where the court has certified and adjudicated a child in accordance with the
provisions of §§ 14-1-7.2 and 14-1-7.3, the jurisdiction of the court shall encompass the power and
authority to sentence the child to a period in excess of the age of nineteen (19) years. However, in
no case shall the sentence be in excess of the maximum penalty provided by statute for the
conviction of the offense.
(m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the jurisdiction of other courts over
offenses committed by any person after he or she reaches the age of eighteen (18) years.
SECTION 2. Section 40-11-12.5 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-11 entitled "Abused
and Neglected Children" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-11-12.5. Review of young adults under the court’s legal supervision and receiving
care and placement services from DCYF.
(a) In the case of a young adult, between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-one (21)
twenty-six (26), who has executed a voluntary placement agreement for continued care and
placement responsibility from the department and for legal supervision of the court, the
permanency plan shall document the reasonable efforts made by the department and the young
adult to finalize a permanency plan that addresses the goal of preparing the young adult for
independence and successful adulthood. This includes, but is not limited to, housing assistance to
obtain supervised independent living arrangements, shared living arrangements or extended foster
and kinship care; education, vocational assessment, job training and employment plan needed to
transition the young adult to self-sufficiency; assisting the young adult in obtaining educational
goals; a job, employment/vocational skills; any other services and supports that will assist the
young adult in accessing available services; applying for public benefits; acquiring important
documents, such as ID card, driver’s license, birth certificate, social security card, health insurance
cards, medical records; attending to physical and mental health needs; maintaining relationships
with individuals who are important to them and acquiring information about siblings and other
maternal and paternal relatives.
(b) Initial judicial determination — The department must petition the court to make a
determination whether remaining in foster care is in the young adult’s best interests.
The court must make a determination within one hundred eighty (180) days of the signing
LC001119 - Page 5 of 7

of the voluntary placement agreement whether remaining in foster care is in the young adult’s best
interest.
(c) The court shall conduct a permanency hearing within one year after the young adult and
the department execute a voluntary placement agreement and annually thereafter. At the
permanency hearing, the department shall present a written case plan to the court for approval that
details the necessary services, care and placement the young adult shall receive to assist the
transition to independence and successful adulthood.
The court must determine whether the department has made reasonable efforts to finalize
a permanency goal of preparing the young adult for successful transition to independence.
(d) Notice of the court hearings shall be served by the department upon all parties in interest
in accordance with the rules of child welfare procedure of the family court.
(e) Periodic formal reviews, shall be held not less than once every one hundred eighty (180)
days to assess the progress and case plan of any young adult under the court’s legal supervision and
under the care and placement responsibility of DCYF pursuant to a voluntary agreement for
extension of care.
The permanency plan shall be reviewed by the court at least once every twelve (12) months
at a permanency hearing and by the department in an administrative review within one hundred
eighty (180) days after the permanency hearing. The young adult is expected to participate in case
planning and periodic reviews.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001119
========
LC001119 - Page 6 of 7